nl: Dansstijl: Ballet; Ballroom; Hedendaags; Flamenco; Hiphop; Ierse dans; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Tapdansen; Andere
hu: Táncstílus: Balett; Társastánc; Kortárs; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Ír tánc; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Sztepptánc; Egyéb
lt-LT: Šokių stilius: Baletas; Pramoginiai; Šiuolaikiniai; Flamenkas; Hiphopas; Airiškas šokis; Džiazas; Salsa; Svingas; Stepas; Kita
da: Dansestil: Ballet; Selskabsdans; Moderne; Flamenco; Hiphop; Irsk dans; Jazz; Salsa; Swingdans; Stepdans; Andet
sv: Dansstil: Balett; Pardans; Samtida; Flamenco; Hiphop; Irländsk dans; Jazz; Salsa; Swingdans; Steppdans; Övrigt
pl: Styl tańca: Balet; Taniec towarzyski; Taniec współczesny; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Taniec irlandzki; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Step; Inne
fr: Style de danse: Ballet; Salle de bal; Contemporain; Flamenco; Hip Hop; Danse irlandaise; Jazz; Salsa; Danse swing; Claquettes; Autre
hr-HR: Plesni stil: Balet; Plesna dvorana; Suvremeni; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Irski ples; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Step; Ostalo
zh-TW: 舞蹈風格: 芭蕾舞; 舞廳; 當代; 佛朗明哥; 嘻哈; 愛爾蘭舞; 爵士樂; 騷沙舞; 搖擺舞; 踢踏舞; 其他
es: Estilo de baile: Ballet; Ballroom; Contemporáneo; Flamenco; Hip hop; Danza irlandesa; Jazz; Salsa; Baile swing; Baile de claqué; Otros
cs: Taneční styl: Balet; Společenské tance; Moderní; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Irský tanec; Jazz; Salsa; Swingový tanec; Stepování; Jiné
fi: Tanssityyli: Baletti; Tanssisali; Nykytanssi; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Irlantilainen tanssi; Jazz; Salsa; Swing-tanssi; Steppi; Muu
sk-SK: Tanečný štýl: Balet; Tanečná sála; Súčasný; Flamenco; Hip hop; Írsky tanec; Jazz; Salsa; Swingový tanec; Stepovanie; Iné
vi: Phong cách khiêu vũ: Ba lê; Phòng khiêu vũ; Đương đại; Flamenco; Hip hop; Điệu nhảy của người Ai-len; Jazz; Salsa; Điệu nhảy Swing; Nhảy thiết hài; Khác
bg-BG: Танцов стил: Балет; Бална зала; Съвременен; Фламенко; Хип-хоп; Ирландски танц; Джаз; Салса; Суинг танц; Степ танц; Други
ro-RO: Stil de dans: Balet; Bal; Contemporan; Flamenco; Hip hop; Dans irlandez; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Step; Altele
sl-SI: Plesni slog: Balet; Dvoranski; Sodoben; Flamenko; Hip hop; Irski ples; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Step; Drugo
it: Stile di danza: Danza classica; Sala da ballo; Contemporaneo; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Danza irlandese; Jazz; Salsa; Ballo swing; Tip tap; Altro
de: Tanzstil: Ballett; Gesellschaftstänze; Zeitgenössisch; Flamenco; Hip-Hop; Irischer Tanz; Jazz; Salsa; Swingtanz; Stepptanz; Sonstiges
ja: ダンススタイル: バレエ; 社交ダンス; コンテンポラリー; フラメンコ; ヒップホップ; アイリッシュダンス; ジャズダンス; サルサ; スイングダンス; タップダンス; その他
zh-CN: 舞蹈风格: 芭蕾舞; 交谊舞; 当代舞; 弗拉明戈舞; 嘻哈舞; 爱尔兰舞; 爵士舞; 萨尔萨舞; 摇摆舞; 踢踏舞; 其他
th: สไตล์การเต้น: บัลเลต์; บอลรูม; ร่วมสมัย; ฟลาเมงโก; ฮิปฮอป; เต้นรำไอริช; แจ๊ส; ซัลซ่า; เต้นสวิง; เต้นแท็ป; อื่นๆ
tr: Dans stili: Bale; Balo salonu; Modern; Flamenko; Hip hop; İrlanda dansı; Caz; Salsa; Swing dansı; Step dansı; Diğer
ru: Стиль танца: Балет; Бальные танцы; Современный; Фламенко; Хип-хоп; Ирландские танцы; Джаз; Сальса; Танец в стиле свинг; Степ; Другое
ko: 댄스 스타일: 발레; 사교 댄스; 컨템포러리; 플라멩코; 힙합; 아일랜드 댄스; 재즈; 살사; 스윙댄스; 탭댄스; 기타
pt-BR: Estilo de dança: Balé; Dança de salão; Contemporâneo; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Dança irlandesa; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Sapateado; Outro
en: Dance style: Ballet; Ballroom; Contemporary; Flamenco; Hip hop; Irish dance; Jazz; Salsa; Swing dance; Tap dance; Other
el: Στυλ χορού: Μπαλέτο; Ευρωπαϊκοί; Επίκαιρη; Φλαμένκο; Χιπ χοπ; Ιρλανδικός χορός; Τζαζ; Σάλσα; Swing; Κλακέτες; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estilo de dança: Balé; Danças de salão; Dança contemporânea; Flamenco; Hip-hop; Dança irlandesa; Jazz; Salsa; Swing; Sapateado; Outro
nb: Dansestil: Ballett; Ballsal; Moderne; Flamenco; Hiphop; Irsk dans; Jazz; Salsa; Swingdans; Tapdans; Annet